California, session 20252026, AB1225.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5008.9 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5008.9. (a) The director shall establish an Accessibility Advisory Committee. The committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the director and make recommendations for improving the accessibility of units of the state park system for individuals with disabilities.(b) The committee shall consist of at least 8 members, but no more than 14 members. The committee’s membership shall include the Chief of the Accessibility Division for the department and, as appointed by the director, no more than two other representatives from the department and other members with demonstrated experience in public accessibility requirements for individuals with disabilities.(c) The committee shall do all of the following:(1) Evaluate disability accessibility models and provisions from relevant federal and state park systems.(2) Review services, programs, and activities provided by the department.(3) Provide recommendations to the director on drafting and updating general plans for the department, as requested by the director.(d) The director may implement the committee’s recommendations as the director deems appropriate.(e) A member shall not receive compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for the member’s reasonable and necessary expenses in connection with service on the committee.